Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 1 General Provisions

29-11-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Adult Guardianship and Conservatorship Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Conservatorship order” means an order appointing a conservator or other order related to management of an adult’s property.

“Conservatorship proceeding” means a judicial proceeding in which a conservatorship order is sought or has been issued.

“Emergency” means a circumstance that likely will result in substantial harm to a respondent’s health, safety, or welfare and for which the appointment of a guardian is necessary because no other person has authority and is willing to act on the respondent’s behalf.

“Guardianship order” means an order appointing a guardian.

“Guardianship proceeding” means a judicial proceeding in which an order for the appointment of a guardian is sought or has been issued.

“Home state” means the state in which the respondent was physically present, including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months immediately before the filing of a petition for a conservatorship order or the appointment of a guardian or, if none, the state in which the respondent was physically present, including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months ending within the six months prior to the filing of the petition.

“Incapacitated person” means an adult for whom a guardian has been appointed, including a ward, as defined in paragraph (27) of Code Section 29-1-1.

“Party” means the respondent, petitioner, guardian, conservator, or any other person allowed by the court to participate in a guardianship proceeding or conservatorship proceeding.

“Person,” except in the term “incapacitated person” or “protected person,” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Protected person” means an adult for whom a conservatorship order has been issued, including a ward, as defined in paragraph (27) of Code Section 29-1-1.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Respondent” means an adult for whom a conservatorship order or the appointment of a guardian is sought, including a proposed ward as defined in paragraph (16) of Code Section 29-1-1.

“Significant-connection state” means a state, other than the home state, with which a respondent has a significant connection other than mere physical presence and in which substantial evidence concerning the respondent is available.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-3.
Treatment of foreign countries.

A court of this state may treat a foreign country as if it were a state for the purpose of applying this article and Articles 2, 3, and 5 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-4.
Communication with out of state courts.

A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter. The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the court shall make a record of the communication. The record may be limited to the fact that the communication occurred.

Courts may communicate concerning schedules, calendars, court records, and other administrative matters without making a record.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-5.
Appropriate requests to and from courts of other jurisdictions.

In a guardianship proceeding or conservatorship proceeding in this state, a court of this state may request the appropriate court of another state to do any of the following:

Hold an evidentiary hearing;

Order a person in that state to produce evidence or give testimony pursuant to procedures of that state;

Order that an evaluation or assessment be made of the respondent;

Order any appropriate investigation of a person involved in a proceeding;

Forward to the court of this state a certified copy of the transcript or other record of a hearing under paragraph (1) of this subsection or any other proceeding, any evidence otherwise produced under paragraph (2) of this subsection, and any evaluation or assessment prepared in compliance with an order under paragraph (3) or (4) of this subsection;

Issue any order necessary to assure the appearance in the proceeding of a person whose presence is necessary for the court to make a determination, including the respondent or the incapacitated person or protected person; or

Issue an order authorizing the release of medical, financial, criminal, or other relevant information in that state, including protected health information as defined in 45 C.F.R. 160.103, as amended.

If a court of another state in which a guardianship proceeding or conservatorship proceeding is pending requests a court of this state to do any action included in subsection (a) of this Code section, such court of this state shall have jurisdiction for the limited purpose of granting the request or making reasonable efforts to comply with the request.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-6.
Procedure for testimony of out of state witnesses.

In a guardianship proceeding or conservatorship proceeding, in addition to other procedures that may be available, testimony of a witness who is located in another state may be offered by deposition or other means allowable in this state for testimony taken in another state. The court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a witness be taken in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony is to be taken.

In a guardianship proceeding or conservatorship proceeding, a court in this state may permit a witness located in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone or audiovisual or other electronic means. A court of this state shall cooperate with the court of the other state in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.